Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 5 Commission on Interstate Cooperation
3. Acts 1979, No. 683.

SECTION 1. PURPOSE. In the passage of this Act, the General Assembly is cognizant of the intent of Section 3 of Act 100 of 1977, which provided for the termination of a number of State agencies on June 30, 1979, unless studies of said State agencies by Joint Interim Committees of the General Assembly, who were assigned in said Section 3 to make “Sunset reviews” of said agencies, determine that the continuation of certain said State agencies is in the public interest. During the interim between the adoption of Act 100 of 1977, and the convening of the 1979 Regular Session of the General Assembly, the respective Joint Interim Committees of the General Assembly have made studies and review of the purposes, activities, justifications, and needs for each of the State agencies enumerated in Section 3 of 1977, and have recommended the continuation of a number of said State agencies. It is, therefore, the purpose of this Act to provide for the continuation of certain of said State agencies, as enumerated in this Act, subsequent to June 30, 1979, and to provide that the provisions of Section 3 of Act 100 of 1977, which would have provided for the termination of the State agencies enumerated herein on June 30, 1979, shall be of no effect, and that said State agencies be continued, and shall continue to function the same as if the provisions of Section 3 of Act 100 of 1979, which provided for their termination, had never been enacted.

SECTION 2. The following State agencies which under the provisions of Section 3 of Act 100 of 1977, were scheduled to terminate on June 30, 1979, are hereby continued, and said State agencies shall continue to function, and shall perform the respective powers, functions and duties assigned to them by law from and after June 30, 1979, the same as they would have functioned if Section 3 of Act 100 of 1977 had never been enacted:

the Arkansas Library Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 139 of 1935, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 6-301, as transferred to the Library Division of the Department of Education by Section 10 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-910, and the Library Division of the Department of Education, created by Section 10 of Act 38 of 1971;

the Arkansas School for the Blind, created by Section 1 of Act 64 of 1879, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2201;

the Arkansas School for the Deaf, created by Section 1 of Act 36 of 1868, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2301;

the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas School for the Blind and Arkansas School for the Deaf, created by Section 2 of Act 1 of 1943, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 7-201;

the Educational Television Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 198 of 1961, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-3901, as transferred to the Educational Television Division of the Department of Education by Section 10 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-910, and the Educational Television Division of the Department of Education, created by Section 10 of Act 38 of 1971;

the Board for Vocational Education, created by Section 187 of Act 169 of 1931, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2514;

the Cooperative Area Manpower Planning System, created by Executive Order 73-1;

the Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board, created by Section 1 of Act 31 of 1965, the same being Arkansas Statutes 53-701, and the Liquefied Petroleum Gas Advisory Committee, created by Section 5 of Act 31 of 1965, the same being Arkansas Statutes 53-704;

the Employment Security Division of the Department of Labor, created by Section 10 of Act 391 of 1941, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-1113;

the Labor Board, created by Section 5 of Act 25 of 1968 (First Extraordinary Session), the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-323;

the Department of Labor, created by Section 2 of Act 161 of 1937, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-915;

the Office of the State Mine Inspector, created by Section 1 of Act 130 of 1917, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 52-401, and as transferred to the Department of Labor by Section 15 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-915;

the Board of Review, created by Section 6 of Act 391 of 1941, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-1107;

the State Advisory Council to the Employment Security Division of the Department of Labor, created by Section 11 of Act 391 of 1941, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-1114;

the Elevator Safety Board, created by Section 2 of Act 189 of 1963, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-1802;

the Boiler Advisory Board, created by Section 2 of Act 494 of 1961, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-502;

the Arkansas Employment Agency Advisory Council, created by Section 3 of Act 493 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-1015;

the Boiler Inspection Division of the Department of Labor, created by Section 1 of Act 494 of 1961, the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-501;

the State Kidney Disease Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 450 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-2502;

the State Spinal Cord Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 311 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-3302;

the Pollution Control Commission, created by Section 3 of Act 472 of 1949, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-1903, transferred to the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology by Section 8 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-908, and the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology created by Section 8 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-908.

the Environmental Preservation Division of the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology, created by Section 8 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-908;

the Division of Water Pollution Control, the Division of Air Pollution Control, the Division of Solid Waste Management, the Division of Environmental Preservation, and the Division of Administration of the Pollution Control Commission, created by Section 2 of Part I of Act 472 of 1949, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-1903, and as transferred to the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology by Section 8 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-908;

the State Health Planning Council, created by Section 3 of Act 305 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-2303, transferred to the Statewide Health Coordinating Council by Section 7 of Act 558 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-3607; and the Statewide Health Coordinating Council, created by Section 7 of Act 558 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-3607;

the Nursing Home Advisory Council, created by Section 8 of Act 58 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-2208;

the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council, created by Section 3 of Act 435 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-3403;

the Child Care Facility Review Board, created by Section 12 of Act 434 of 1969, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 83-911;

the Burial Association Board, created by Section 2 of Act 91 of 1953, the same being Arkansas Statutes 66-1802;

the Arkansas Transportation Commission, formerly known as the Arkansas Commerce Commission, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by the same Act;

the Arkansas Waterways Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 242 of 1967, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 21-1701;

the Arkansas Turnpike Authority, created by Section 2 of Act 312 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 76-2402;

the Mississippi River Parkway Commission of Arkansas, created by Section 1 of Act 151 of 1961, the same being Arkansas Statutes 76-1812, which was transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by Section 1 of Act 496 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907.1;

the Division of Soil and Water Resources of the Department of Commerce, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Arkansas Soil and Water Conservation Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 14 of 1963, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-118, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 33 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 87 of 1963, the same being Arkansas Statutes 78-301, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the State Plant Board, created by Section 3 of Act 414 of 1917, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 77-103, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Weights and Measures Division of the State Plant Board, created by Section 6 of Act 482 of 1963, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 79-206, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Division of Livestock, Poultry, and Agriculture of the Department of Commerce, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Division of Plants of the Department of Commerce, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Department of Parks and Tourism, created by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907;

the State Parks, Recreation and Travel Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 330 of 1955, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-202, which was transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Arkansas Territorial Capitol Restoration Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 388 of 1939, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 8-102, which was transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907, and transferred to the Department of Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage by Section 4 of Act 1001 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-923;

the Publicity Division of the Arkansas Publicity and Parks Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 310 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-221, which was transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907;

the Arkansas History Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 355 of 1911, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 6-201, which was transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907;

the Monuments and Historical Sites Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism, created by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907;

the Police Division of the Department of Public Safety, created by Section 14 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914;

the Department of Public Safety, created by Section 14 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914;

the Law Enforcement Training Academy Division of the Department of Public Safety, created by Section 14 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914;

the Police Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 394 of 1969, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 42-403;

the Enforcement Division of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission, created by Section 18 of Act 159 of 1951, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 48-1317, which was transferred to the Department of Public Safety by Section 14 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914;

the State Fire Marshal Enforcement Section of the Department of Public Safety, created by Section 21 of Act 1017 of 1975 (Ext. Sess. 1976), the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914.1;

the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy, created by Section 1 of Act 526 of 1963, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 42-701, which was transferred to the Department of Public Safety by Section 14 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914;

the Department of Correction, created by Section 1 of Act 50 of 1968 (First Extraordinary Session), as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 46-100;

the Board of Pardons and Paroles, created by Section 1 of Act 621 of 1969, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 43-2802;

the State Penitentiary Board, created by Section 1 of Act 208 of 1945, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes (1964) 43-2801, as renamed the Board of Correction by Section 2 of Act 50 of 1968 (First Extraordinary Session), as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 46-101;

the Veterans Service Office, created by Section 1 of Act 234 of 1945, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 11-1401;

the State Building Services, created by Section 5 of Act 716 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-1022;

the War Memorial Stadium Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 249 of 1947, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-3401;

the Capitol Zoning District Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 267 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-235;

the Claims Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 276 of 1955, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 13-1401;

the Criminal Detention Facilities Board, created by Section 3 of Act 244 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 46-1202;

the Governor's Mansion Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 400 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-313;

the Arkansas Commission on Interstate Cooperation, created by Section 2 of Act 378 of 1951, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 6-112;

the Executive Committee on Law Enforcement Standards, created by Section 6 of Act 452 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 42-1005;

the State Administration Department, created by Section 1 of Act 468 of 1967, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-801, which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Criminal Justice and Highway Safety Information Center, created by Section 1 of Act 286 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-1101;

the Budget and Accounting Division; the Local Affairs and Audit Division; the Administrative Services Division; and the Purchasing Division of the State Administration Department, created by Section 3 of Act 468 of 1967, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-803, which were transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Surplus Property Program, created by Section 1 of Act 303 of 1945, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-732, which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the State Printing Board, created by Section 2 of Act 544 of 1975, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 14-302;

the Board of Finance, created by Section 1 of Act 338 of 1955, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 13-401;

the Board of Directors of the Garland Levee District, created by Act 311 of 1913;

the Board of Directors of the Miller Levee District No. 2, created by Act 69 of 1911;

the Board of Directors of the Red River Levee District No. 1, created by Act 97 of 1905;

the Red River Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 264 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 21-1014;

the Department of Finance and Administration, created by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Personnel Division of the State Administration Department, created by Section 1 of Act 466 of 1967, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-810, which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Office of Telecommunications, created by Section 2 of Act 47 of 1968 (First Extraordinary Session), the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-824, which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Office of Data Processing, created by Section 2 of Act 46 of 1968 (First Extraordinary Session), the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-820, which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Older Worker Community Service Employment Program, created by Section 2 of Act 815 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-1502, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904;

the Merit Council, as referred to in Section 6 of Act 280 of 1939, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 83-107;

the Arkansas Racing Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 46 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 84-2728, which was transferred to the Division of Racing of the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Racing Division of the Department of Finance and Administration, created by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Office of Commissioner of Revenues, created by Section 2 of Act 88 of 1925, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 84-1701, which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Tax Division and the Assessment Coordination Division of the Public Service Commission, which were created by Section 1 of Act 245 of 1959, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 84-114;

the Poison Springs State Park, created by Section 1 of Act 182 of 1961, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-635, which was transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907;

the Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission, created by Section 4 of Act 388 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 75-2304.

SECTION 3. The following State Agencies, which, under the provisions of Section 3 of Act 100 of 1977, were scheduled to terminate on June 30, 1979, are hereby continued until June 30, 1981, for the purpose of enabling the appropriate Joint Interim Committee of the General Assembly, as designated below, to continue to review said agencies for the purpose of recommending to the 73rd General Assembly whether said state agencies should continue to function after June 30, 1981, or terminate on said date as provided herein:

The following State Agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1981, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Education:

the State Department of Education and the State Board of Education, created by Section 3 of Act 169 of 1931, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-102, which were transferred to the Department of Education under the provisions of Section 10 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-910.

The following State Agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1981, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on City, County and Local Affairs:

the Department of Local Services, created by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904;

the Local Services Advisory Council, created by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904;

the Office of Local and Regional Services within the Department of Local Services, created by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904;

the Health Planning Program of the Office of the Governor, transferred to the Department of Planning by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes (1973 Suppl.) 5-904, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 1 of Act 278 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes (1976) 5-904;

the Comprehensive State Health Planning Agency, created by Section 1 of Act 305 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-2301, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904, and which was transferred to the State Health Planning and Development Agency by Section 7 of Act 558 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-3607; and

the Health Planning Advisory Council, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904.

The following State Agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1981, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Judiciary:

the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Finance and Administration, formerly the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, created by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Workshop-Made Products Committee, created by Section 1 of Act 405 of 1973, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 14-229; and

The following State Agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1981, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs:

the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, created by Section 1 of Act 159 of 1951, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 48-1301, which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Finance and Administration, created by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

The following State Agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1981, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs:

the Arkansas Highway Retirement System, created by Section 2 of Act 454 of 1949, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 76-1902;

the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, created by Section 16 of Act 93 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-1436;

the State Police Retirement System, created by Section 1 of Act 311 of 1951, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 42-451;

the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, created by Section 2 of Act 365 of 1953, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 22-902;

the Arkansas Quasi-Judicial Retirement System, created by Section 1 of Act 148 of 1965, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2701;

the State Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 4 of Act 177 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2504;

the County Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 4 of Act 177 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2504;

the Municipal Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 4 of Act 177 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2504;

the Non-Teacher Public School Employees Division of the Public Employees Retirement System; created by Section 1 of Act 63 of 1965, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2542;

the General Assembly Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 1 of Act 202 of 1961, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2510.2;

the Retired Constitutional Officers Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 6 of Act 103 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2511.2;

the County Elected Constitutional Officers Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 1 of Act 581 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2511.5; and

the Arkansas Retirement Systems Study Committee, created by Section 1 of Act 293 of 1975.

SECTION 4. That the following Subsections of Section 3 of Act 100 of 1977, as hereby repealed:

Subsection (1) of Subsection (a) of Section 3; Subsections (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of Subsection (e) of Section 3; Subsection (7) and Subsection (13) of Subsection (g) of Section 3; Subsections (18) and (19) of Subsection (h) of Section 3; and Subsections (1) through (13) inclusive of Subsection (j) of Section 3.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Section 3 of Act 100 of 1977 provided for the termination of a number of State Agencies and programs to be effective on June 30, 1979, that it was the intention of said Act that each of said agencies and programs would be reviewed in the interim between the recess and adjournment and the convening of the 72nd General Assembly by the Legislative Joint Interim Committees of the General Assembly to evaluate the purposes, duties and accomplishments of said agencies and programs with the view that the General Assembly would take action to restore and continue those agencies and programs that were needed in the public interests, that other agencies and programs would be reorganized and that other agencies and programs would be allowed to terminate as provided by Act 100 of 1977; and, as a result of said studies during the interim prior to the convening of the 72nd General Assembly recommendations have been made to restore and continue the operations of numerous agencies and programs which were to terminate on June 30, 1979, and recommendations were made that other agencies and programs be extended for two more years for further study and to terminate on June 30, 1981 unless restored and continued by the 73rd General Assembly; that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to restore and continue the various agencies and programs identified in this Act and that said action should be taken prior to June 30, 1979, at which time said agencies would be terminated under the provisions of Act 100 of 1977, it being the intent of this Act that the agencies and programs defined herein would continue to function. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

APPROVED: April 2, 1979.

SECTION 1. PURPOSE. In the passage of this Act, the General Assembly is cognizant of the intent of Section 4 of Act 100 of 1977, Section 3 of Act 683 of 1979 and Section 2 of Act 1021 of 1979, which provided for the termination of a number of state agencies on June 30, 1981 unless studies of said state agencies by joint interim committees of the General Assembly, who were assigned in said Acts to make “Sunset reviews” of said agencies, determine that the continuation of certain of said state agencies is in the public interest. During the interim between the adoption of Act 100 of 1977, Act 683 of 1979 and Act 1021 of 1979, and the convening of the 1981 Regular Session of the General Assembly, the respective joint interim committees of the General Assembly have made studies and review of the purposes, activities, justifications, and needs for each of the state agencies enumerated in Section 4 of Act 100 of 1977, Section 3 of Act 683 of 1979 and Section 2 of Act 1021 of 1979, and have recommended the continuation of a number of said state agencies. It is, therefore, the purpose of this Act to provide for the continuation of certain of said state agencies, as enumerated in this Act, subsequent to June 30, 1981, and to provide that the provisions of Section 4 of Act 100 of 1977, Section 3 of Act 683 of 1979, and Section 2 of Act 1021 of 1979, which would have provided for the termination of the state agencies enumerated herein on June 30, 1981, shall be of no effect, and that said state agencies be continued, and shall continue to function the same as if the provisions of Section 4 of Act 100 of 1977, Section 3 of Act 683 of 1979 and Section 2 of Act 1021 of 1979, which provided for their termination, had never been enacted.

SECTION 2. The following state agencies which under the provisions of Section 4 of Act 100 of 1977, Section 3 of Act 683 of 1979 and Section 2 of Act 1021 of 1979, were scheduled to terminate on June 30, 1981, are hereby continued, and said state agencies shall continue to function, and shall perform the respective powers, functions and duties assigned to them by law from and after June 30, 1981, the same as they would have functioned if Section 4 of Act 100 of 1977, Section 3 of Act 683 of 1979 and Section 2 of Act 1021 of 1979 had never been enacted:

the Municipal Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 4 of Act 177 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2504;

the Non-Teacher Public School Employees Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 1 of Act 63 of 1965, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2542;

the General Assembly Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 1 of Act 202 of 1961, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2510.2;

the Retired Constitutional Officers Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 6 of Act 103 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2511.2;

the Department of Revenues, created by Section 2 of Act 88 of 1925, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 84-1701, which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the State Bank Department, created by Section 1 of Act 113 of 1913, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 67-101, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the State Banking Board, created by Section 1 of Act 60 of 1933, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 67-201, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended;

the State Insurance Department, created by Section 16 of Act 148 of 1959, the same being Arkansas Statutes 66-2101, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Securities Division of the State Bank Department, created by Section 30 of Act 254 of 1959, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 67-1262, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916, and which was further revised and separated from the State Bank Department by Act 471 of 1973;

the Savings and Loan Association Board, created by Section 5 of Act 227 of 1963, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 67-1805, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Arkansas Public Service Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 40 of 1945, the same being Arkansas Statutes 73-101, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the State Military Department, created by Act 85 of 1929, as amended, which was transferred to the Department of Public Safety, as a Military Division thereof by Section 14 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914, and which was reestablished as an independent State agency by Section 4 of Act 45 of 1981;

the Early Childhood Development Program, created by Section 1 of Act 63 of 1969, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-1644;

the Board of Education, created by Section 3 of Act 169 of 1931, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-102;

the School Self-Insurance Advisory Committee, created by Section 4 of Act 380 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-3512;

the School Self-Insurance Program, created by Section 6 of Act 380 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-3514;

the Education Commission of the States, created by Section 1 of Act 22 of 1965 (Second Extraordinary Session), as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-4501;

the Student Loan Guarantee Program, created by Section 2 of Act 27 of 1968 (First Extraordinary Session), the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-4013;

the State Board of Higher Education created by Section 2 of Act 560 of 1977, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-4902;

the Department of Higher Education, created by Section 9 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-909;

the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners created by Section 4 of Act 706 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-418;

the Department of Health created by Section 11 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-911;

the State Cancer Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 277 of 1945, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-601 which was transferred to the Chronic Disease Division of the Department of Health by Section 11 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-911;

the Disability Determination for Social Security Administration, created by Section 1 of Act 14 of 1961 (Second Extraordinary Session), the same being Arkansas Statutes 83-801;

the Commission on Community Based Rehabilitation, created by Section 3 of Act 378 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 43-2341;

the Division of Rehabilitative Services of the Department of Human Services, created by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Division of Rehabilitation Services for the Blind, created by Section 1 of Act 180 of 1965, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2566, transferred to the Office of the Blind and Visually Impaired of the Department of Human Services by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the State Health Planning and Development Agency, located within the Department of Health, created by Section 1 of Act 558 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-2307;

the Blind Advisory Committee, created by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Office of the Blind and Visually Impaired of the Department of Human Services, created by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners, created by Section 3 of Act 650 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-1134;

the State Board of Sanitarians, created by Section 4 of Act 281 of 1957, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-1604;

the Psychology Examiners Board, created by Section 1 of Act 129 of 1955, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-1501;

the Board of Podiatry, created by Section 2 of Act 610 of 1923, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-302;

the Wastewater Plant Operators Licensing Committee, created by Section 2 of Act 211 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-1984;

the Board of Pharmacy, created by Section 2 of Act 50 of 1891, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-1002;

the Board of Optometry, created by Section 2 of Act 94 of 1941, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-802;

the Board of Hearing Aid Dispensers, created by Section 1 of Act 197 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-1701;

the Arkansas Board of Private Investigators and Private Security Agencies created by Section 4 of Act 429 of 1977, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-2125;

the Board of Dental Examiners, created by Section 2 of Act 14 of 1955, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-535;

the Coal Mine Examining Board, created by Section 1 of Act 486 of 1919, the same being Arkansas Statutes 52-501;

the Cemetery Board, created by Section 4 of Act 250 of 1953, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-414;

the State Medical Board, created by Section 2 of Act 65 of 1955, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-602;

the Board of Physical Therapy, created by Section 3 of Act 141 of 1959, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-1319;

the Great River Road Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism, created by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907;

the State Forestry Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 42 of 1953, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-701.1, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Arkansas Geological Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 16 of 1963, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-400, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Oil and Gas Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 105 of 1939, the same being Arkansas Statutes 53-101, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Division of Forestry of the Department of Commerce, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Division of Natural Resources of the Department of Commerce, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Arkansas Commerce Commission, Arkansas Transportation Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 132 of 1957, the same being Arkansas Statutes 73-152, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce and renamed the Arkansas Transportation Commission by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Arkansas Historical Preservation Program, created by Section 1 of Act 368 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 8-901, which was transferred to the Department of Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage by Section 4 of Act 1001 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-923;

the Arkansas Commemorative Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 256 of 1947, the same being Arkansas Statutes 8-201, which was transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907, which was transferred to the Department of Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage by Section 4 of Act 1001 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-923;

the Arkansas Museum and Cultural Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 515 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 6-1202;

the Arts and Humanities Advisory Council of the Department of Local Services, created by Section 3 of Act 359 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 6-1003, and transferred to the Department of Natural and Cultural Heritage by Section 4 of Act 1001 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-923;

the State Committee on Stream Preservation, created by Section 1 of Act 437 of 1967, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-1201, which was transferred to the Department of Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage by Section 4 of Act 1001 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-923; and transferred to the Arkansas Natural and Scenic Rivers Commission within the Department of Natural Cultural Heritage by Section 3 of Act 257 of 1979, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-1203;

the Department of Natural and Cultural Heritage, created by Section 4 of Act 1001 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-923;
